Massachusetts, session 194th, H1262.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 176X of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in Section 2(d), lines 46 and 47, the words “or if a
carrier’s reported contribution to surplus exceeds 1.9 per cent”
SECTION 2. Chapter 176X of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out Section 3(a)(i) and inserting in place thereof the
following words:-market group size, including individual; small groups of 2-50; and large groups
of greater than 50; and
SECTION 3. Chapter 176X of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out Section 3(c)
SECTION 4. Chapter 176X of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in Section 3(e ), after the words “60 days” in line 96,
the following words:- Life insurers will apply the RBC model according to 211 CMR 20.00.
of 2

Those life and other multi-line carriers that have the majority of their liabilities in non-dental or
non-Massachusetts insurance lines shall not exceed 700% of their respective Company Action
Level (CAL), as defined in 211 CMR 20.00. Massachusetts-based health and dental-only
carriers shall apply the RBC model according to 211 CMR 25.
SECTION 5. Chapter 176X of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out Section 3(f) and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- The commissioner may waive specific reporting requirements in this section
for carriers unable to provide the required information; provided, however, that the
commissioner shall provide written notice of any such waiver to the joint committee on health
care financing and the house and senate committees on ways and means.
of 2